District of Columbia statutes.
6-601.09

Right of Congress to alter or repeal.

Congress reserves the right to alter, amend, or repeal this subchapter.

History

June 1, 1910, 36 Stat. 455, ch. 263, § 9

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-409.
1973 Ed., § 5-409.